Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Part 1

General Provisions

26-1-101. Writs to secure property.

If a judgment or decree be that the party recover or be put in possession of the specific property, real or personal, the court may carry the same into effect by writ of possession or other process sufficient for the purpose.

Code 1858, § 2997; Shan., § 4727; Code 1932, § 8861; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-101.

Cross-References. Effect of writ in forcible entry and detainer, § 29-18-123.

Writ of possession in ejectment, § 29-15-114.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 301.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 2; 20 Tenn. Juris., Possession, Writ of, § 1.

Law Reviews.

A Review of Tennessee Exemptions in Light of the Bankruptcy Code (Jennie D. Latta), 28 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 26 (1992).

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

Power of Sale Foreclosure in Tennessee: A Section 1983 Trap (Jack Jones and J. Michael Ivens), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 279 (1984).

26-1-102. Attachment in nature of execution.

In all cases where judicial process or execution, according to the principles of the common law, cannot be made to apply to the purpose of carrying into effect any judgment or decree of a court of record, the court may enforce the judgment or decree by attachment for contempt, in the nature of an execution. The proceedings under this writ are the same as are prescribed by this Code for the enforcement of the decrees of the chancery court, in §§ 21-1-801 — 21-1-809.

Code 1858, §§ 3104, 3105 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 22); Shan., §§ 4832, 4833; Code 1932, §§ 8963, 8964; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 102.

Law Reviews.

Forms of Relief, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 400.

26-1-103. Enforcement of money judgments.

All judgments and decrees of any of the judicial tribunals of this state for money may be enforced by execution.

Code 1858, § 2998 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 2); Shan., § 4728; Code 1932, § 8862; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-103.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 307.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

26-1-104. Property subject to execution.

Executions issue against the goods and chattels, lands and tenements, of the defendant.

Code 1858, § 2999 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 2; 1794, ch. 1, § 23); Shan., § 4729; Code 1932, § 8863; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-104.

Cross-References. Order of liability of parties stated, § 26-3-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 11.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

26-1-105. Distringas or fieri facias against corporate property.

The party, in whose favor a judgment or decree is rendered against a corporation, may sue out a distringas or fieri facias, to be levied as well on the choses in action as on the goods, chattels, lands, and tenements of the corporation, and, in case of a levy on choses in action, the court may appoint a receiver to collect the same.

Code 1858, § 3000 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 55, § 4); Shan., § 4730; Code 1932, § 8864; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-105.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 301, 307, 310.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 11; 21 Tenn. Juris., Receivers, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

26-1-106. Execution for benefit of executive officer's sureties.

Whenever a judgment by motion or action at law is had against a sheriff, coroner, or constable, and the official sureties of such officer, for a failure of duty in and about an execution, and the amount of such judgment has been paid by the sureties, the sureties are entitled, at their cost and risk, to issue an execution for their benefit on the original judgment.

The clerk shall, in such case, endorse upon the execution at whose instance it is sued out, and take from such persons bond with security in a sufficient amount for the costs and damages which may accrue.

Code 1858, §§ 2994, 2995 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 145, § 1); Shan., §§ 4724, 4725; Code 1932, §§ 8858, 8859; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 26-106, 26-107.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 68.

26-1-107. Setting aside satisfaction after recovery of property by defendant.

In all cases in which property, real or personal, is recovered from the purchaser at execution or master's sale, by the defendant, heirs or representatives of the defendant, or by third persons, the court rendering the judgment or making the sale, may, in its discretion, upon application of such purchaser, and scire facias sued out, set aside the satisfaction entered, and revive the original judgment or decree for the benefit of the purchaser.

Code 1858, § 2996 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 119); Shan., § 4726; Code 1932, § 8860; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-108.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 50; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 68.

26-1-108. Return of original before issue of alias execution.

No alias or pluries execution shall issue until the previous execution is returned, or satisfactorily accounted for by affidavit.

Code 1858, § 3020 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 17); Shan., § 4748; Code 1932, § 8882; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 10, 53.

26-1-109. When executions tested.

Court executions are tested the day of issuance.

Code 1858, § 3001; Shan., § 4731; Code 1932, § 8865; Acts 1975, ch. 95, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-110; Acts 1985, ch. 131, § 1.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 714.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 7, 10, 15, 22.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

26-1-110. Garnishee unable to identify defendant.

A garnishee who:

Receives an execution without the defendant's social security number, if an individual, or federal taxpayer identification, if a corporation, partnership, trust or other entity; and

After reasonable effort is otherwise unable to identify the defendant or to distinguish the defendant from other individuals or entities based on the information provided on the execution;

may return the execution with the statement “Defendant cannot be identified or distinguished from information provided on the execution.”

The failure to include a social security number or taxpayer identification number shall not invalidate the execution.

Acts 1994, ch. 836, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. A state may not provide a garnishee with a defendant's social security number without the defendant's authorization, OAG 02-016, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/6/02).

26-1-111. Suspension of foreclosure proceedings for active military personnel.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a member of a reserve or Tennessee national guard unit entered into a mortgage or deed of trust for the purchase of a home, or a contract for the purchase of a motor vehicle, and the person is subsequently called into active military service of the United States, as defined in § 58-1-102, and is stationed outside the United States during hostilities, then any provision of the contract or mortgage or deed of trust providing for foreclosure on the property or repossession of the motor vehicle shall be suspended until ninety (90) days following the military personnel’s return to this state.

To exercise the benefits of this section, a service member shall, at any time prior to or during deployment, provide a written notice to the holder of the indebtedness stating the following:

The person is a member of the reserve or Tennessee national guard;

The member has been called to active duty;

A copy of the deployment order is attached; and

The anticipated date of return to the state.

In any action to foreclose or repossess as provided in this section, the holder of the indebtedness is entitled to rely on the anticipated date of return or discharge stated in either the deployment order or in the statement provided in subdivision (b)(1)(A)(iv) when seeking to foreclose or repossess.

At any stage before a final foreclosure sale or a final sale of repossessed property under the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapters 1-9, the sale shall be stayed; provided, that the service member gives notice as provided in § 202 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Appx. § 522).

This section shall not apply to a service member who executes a waiver pursuant to § 107 of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. Appx. § 517).

Acts 2006, ch. 677, § 1.

Cross-References. Notice of foreclosure on home equity conversion mortgages, § 47-30-113.

Redemption of real estate sold for debt, title 66, ch. 8.